New York, session 2025-2026, S8642.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "planning approval predictability act". 3 § 2. Subdivisions 2 and 5 of section 274-a of the town law, subdivi- 4 sion 2 as added by chapter 694 of the laws of 1992 and subdivision 5 as 5 amended by chapter 486 of the laws of 1994, are amended to read as 6 follows: 7 2. Approval of site plans. (a) The town board may, as part of a zoning 8 ordinance or local law adopted pursuant to this article or other enabl- 9 ing law, authorize the planning board or such other administrative body 10 that it shall so designate, to review and approve, approve with modifi- 11 cations or disapprove site plans prepared to specifications set forth in 12 the ordinance or local law and/or in regulations of such authorized 13 board. Site plans shall show the arrangement, layout and design of the 14 proposed use of the land on said plan as designated by the form provided 15 pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subdivision. The ordinance or local 16 law shall specify the land uses that require site plan and the elements 17 to be included on plans submitted for approval. The required site plan 18 elements which are included in the zoning ordinance or local law may 19 include, where appropriate, those related to parking, means of access, 20 screening, signs, landscaping, architectural features, location and 21 dimensions of buildings, adjacent land uses and physical features meant 22 to protect adjacent land uses as well as any additional elements speci- 23 fied by the town board in such zoning ordinance or local law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13715-11-6 S. 8642--B 2 1 (b) When an authorization to approve site plans is granted by the town 2 board pursuant to this section, the terms thereof may condition the 3 issuance of a building permit upon such approval. 4 (c) (i) A planning board or other administrative body authorized to 5 designate, review and approve, approve with modifications, or disapprove 6 site plans pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision shall develop 7 and make available an application form to be filled out for submission 8 of such site plans. Such form shall include a complete list of all 9 studies, reports, documents, and technical standards required for a 10 complete application. The reviewing authority has the ability to either 11 deem the form complete or incomplete within thirty days of submission. 12 Such form shall be published in a manner easily accessible to the 13 public. 14 (ii) No planning board or other administrative body authorized to 15 designate, review and approve, approve with modifications, or disapprove 16 site plans pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision shall require 17 any additional studies, reports, or documents to be submitted as part of 18 an application for site plan review beyond what is required by the form 19 developed pursuant to subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, except where: 20 (1) the applicant's submission does not otherwise comply with the 21 standards set forth in such form; or 22 (2) the scope or scale of the project materially changes after 23 submission of such form as determined by the planning board or other 24 administrative body. 25 (iii) A planning board or other administrative body authorized to 26 designate, review and approve, approve with modifications, or disapprove 27 site plans pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision may update the 28 form developed pursuant to subparagraph (i) of this paragraph from time 29 to time. Any such updates shall be reported to applicants that have open 30 or pending applications for site review within ten days of any such 31 changes. Amendments by such applicants shall be accepted to maintain 32 compliance with such updated form. 33 (iv) Within thirty days after the submission of a site plan applica- 34 tion that has been deemed complete by the reviewing authority pursuant 35 to this paragraph, the planning board or other administrative body 36 authorized to designate, review and approve, approve with modifications, 37 or disapprove site plans pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision 38 shall notify the applicant in writing whether their application is 39 complete. If no such notice is provided within such thirty-day period, 40 the application shall be deemed complete for all purposes of this 41 section. An actual determination of completeness, or a constructive 42 determination of completeness under this paragraph, shall not be 43 construed as an approval of the site plan, but shall commence the period 44 for substantive review and decision on such application as otherwise 45 provided by law. 46 5. Waiver of requirements. The town board may further empower the 47 authorized board to, when reasonable, waive any requirements for the 48 approval, approval with modifications or disapproval of site plans 49 submitted for approval, provided, however, that the requirements under 50 paragraph (c) of subdivision two of this section shall not be waived. 51 Any such waiver, which shall be subject to appropriate conditions set 52 forth in the ordinance or local law adopted pursuant to this section, 53 may be exercised in the event any such requirements are found not to be 54 requisite in the interest of the public health, safety or general 55 welfare or inappropriate to a particular site plan. S. 8642--B 3 1 § 3. Subdivisions 2 and 5 of section 7-725-a of the village law, 2 subdivision 2 as added by chapter 694 of the laws of 1992, paragraph (a) 3 of subdivision 2 as amended by chapter 423 of the laws of 1995, and 4 subdivision 5 as amended by chapter 486 of the laws of 1994, are amended 5 to read as follows: 6 2. Approval of site plans. (a) The village board of trustees may, as 7 part of a local law adopted pursuant to this article or other enabling 8 law, authorize the planning board or such other administrative body that 9 it shall so designate, to review and approve, approve with modifications 10 or disapprove site plans, prepared to specifications set forth in the 11 local law and/or in regulations of such authorized board. Site plans 12 shall show the arrangement, layout and design of the proposed use of the 13 land on said plan as designated by the form provided pursuant to para- 14 graph (c) of this subdivision. The local law shall specify the land uses 15 that require site plan approval and the elements to be included on plans 16 submitted for approval. The required site plan elements which are 17 included in the local law may include, where appropriate, those related 18 to parking, means of access, screening, signs, landscaping, architec- 19 tural features, location and dimensions of buildings, adjacent land uses 20 and physical features meant to protect adjacent land uses as well as any 21 additional elements specified by the village board of trustees in such 22 local law. 23 (b) When an authorization to approve site plans is granted by the 24 village board of trustees pursuant to this section, the terms thereof 25 may condition the issuance of a building permit upon such approval. 26 (c) (i) A planning board or other administrative body authorized to 27 designate, review and approve, approve with modifications, or disapprove 28 site plans pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision shall develop 29 and make available an application form to be filled out for submission 30 of such site plans. Such form shall include a complete list of all 31 studies, reports, documents, and technical standards required for a 32 complete application. The reviewing authority has the ability to either 33 deem the form complete or incomplete within thirty days of submission. 34 Such form shall be published in a manner easily accessible to the 35 public. 36 (ii) No planning board or other administrative body authorized to 37 designate, review and approve, approve with modifications, or disapprove 38 site plans pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision shall require 39 any additional studies, reports, or documents to be submitted as part of 40 an application for site plan review beyond what is required by the form 41 developed pursuant to subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, except where: 42 (1) the applicant's submission does not otherwise comply with the 43 standards set forth in such form; or 44 (2) the scope or scale of the project materially changes after 45 submission of such form form as determined by the planning board or 46 other administrative body. 47 (iii) A planning board or other administrative body authorized to 48 designate, review and approve, approve with modifications, or disapprove 49 site plans pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision may update the 50 form developed pursuant to subparagraph (i) of this paragraph from time 51 to time. Any such updates shall be reported to applicants that have open 52 or pending applications for site review within ten days of any such 53 changes. Amendments by such applicants shall be accepted to maintain 54 compliance with such updated form. 55 (iv) Within thirty days after the submission of a site plan applica- 56 tion that has been deemed complete by the reviewing authority, pursuant S. 8642--B 4 1 to this paragraph, the planning board or other administrative body 2 authorized to designate, review and approve, approve with modifications, 3 or disapprove site plans pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision 4 shall notify the applicant in writing whether their application is 5 complete. If no such notice is provided within such thirty-day period, 6 the application shall be deemed complete for all purposes of this 7 section. An actual determination of completeness, or a constructive 8 determination of completeness under this paragraph, shall not be 9 construed as an approval of the site plan, but shall commence the period 10 for substantive review and decision on such application as otherwise 11 provided by law. 12 5. Waiver of requirements. The village board of trustees may further 13 empower the authorized board to, when reasonable, waive any requirements 14 for the approval, approval with modifications or disapproval of site 15 plans submitted for approval, provided, however, that the requirements 16 under paragraph (c) of subdivision two of this section shall not be 17 waived. Any such waiver, which shall be subject to appropriate condi- 18 tions set forth in the local law adopted pursuant to this section, may 19 be exercised in the event any such requirements are found not to be 20 requisite in the interest of the public health, safety or general 21 welfare or inappropriate to a particular site plan. 22 § 4. Subdivisions 2 and 5 of section 27-a of the general city law, as 23 added by chapter 211 of the laws of 1993 and paragraph a of subdivision 24 2 as amended by chapter 458 of the laws of 1997, are amended to read as 25 follows: 26 2. Approval of site plans. a. The legislative body of each city may, 27 as part of a zoning ordinance or local law adopted pursuant to subdivi- 28 sions twenty-four and twenty-five of section twenty of this chapter or 29 by local law or ordinance adopted pursuant to other enabling law, 30 authorize the planning board or such other administrative body that it 31 shall so designate, to review and approve, approve with modifications or 32 disapprove site plans, prepared to specifications set forth in the ordi- 33 nance or local law and/or in regulations of such authorized board. Site 34 plans shall show the arrangement, layout and design of the proposed use 35 of the land on said plan as designated by the form provided pursuant to 36 paragraph c of this subdivision. The ordinance or local law shall speci- 37 fy the land uses that require site plan approval and the elements to be 38 included on plans submitted for approval. The required site plan 39 elements which are included in the local law or ordinance may include, 40 where appropriate, those related to parking, means of access, screening, 41 signs, landscaping, architectural features, location and dimensions of 42 buildings, adjacent land uses and physical features meant to protect 43 adjacent land uses as well as any additional elements specified by the 44 legislative body in such zoning ordinance or local law. 45 b. When an authorization to approve site plans is granted by the 46 legislative body pursuant to this section, the terms thereof may condi- 47 tion the issuance of a building permit upon such approval. 48 c. (i) A planning board or other administrative body authorized to 49 designate, review and approve, approve with modifications, or disapprove 50 site plans pursuant to paragraph a of this subdivision shall develop and 51 make available an application form to be filled out for submission of 52 such site plans. Such form shall include a complete list of all studies, 53 reports, documents, and technical standards required for a complete 54 application. The reviewing authority has the ability to either deem the 55 form complete or incomplete within thirty days of submission. Such form 56 shall be published in a manner easily accessible to the public. S. 8642--B 5 1 (ii) No planning board or other administrative body authorized to 2 designate, review and approve, approve with modifications, or disapprove 3 site plans pursuant to paragraph a of this subdivision shall require any 4 additional studies, reports, or documents to be submitted as part of an 5 application for site plan review beyond what is required by the form 6 developed pursuant to subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, except where: 7 (1) the applicant's submission does not otherwise comply with the 8 standards set forth in such form; or 9 (2) the scope or scale of the project materially changes after 10 submission of such form as determined by the planning board or other 11 administrative body. 12 (iii) A planning board or other administrative body authorized to 13 designate, review and approve, approve with modifications, or disapprove 14 site plans pursuant to paragraph a of this subdivision may update the 15 form developed pursuant to subparagraph (i) of this paragraph from time 16 to time. Any such updates shall be reported to applicants that have open 17 or pending applications for site review within ten days of any such 18 changes. Amendments by such applicants shall be accepted to maintain 19 compliance with such updated form. 20 (iv) Within thirty days after the submission of a site plan applica- 21 tion that has been deemed complete by the reviewing authority, pursuant 22 to this paragraph, the planning board or other administrative body 23 authorized to designate, review and approve, approve with modifications, 24 or disapprove site plans pursuant to paragraph a of this subdivision 25 shall notify the applicant in writing whether their application is 26 complete. If no such notice is provided within such thirty-day period, 27 the application shall be deemed complete for all purposes of this 28 section. An actual determination of completeness, or a constructive 29 determination of completeness under this paragraph, shall not be 30 construed as an approval of the site plan, but shall commence the period 31 for substantive review and decision on such application as otherwise 32 provided by law. 33 5. Waiver of requirements. The legislative body may further empower 34 the authorized board to, when reasonable, waive any requirements for the 35 approval, approval with modifications or disapproval of site plans 36 submitted for approval, provided, however, that the requirements under 37 paragraph c of subdivision two of this section shall not be waived. Any 38 such waiver, which shall be subject to appropriate conditions set forth 39 in the local law adopted pursuant to this section, may be exercised in 40 the event any such requirements are found not to be requisite in the 41 interest of the public health, safety and general welfare or inappropri- 42 ate to a particular site plan. 43 § 5. The forms required to be developed pursuant to paragraph (c) of 44 subdivision 2 of section 274-a of the town law, paragraph (c) of subdi- 45 vision 2 of section 7-725-a of the village law, and paragraph c of 46 subdivision 2 of section 27-a of the general city law, as amended by 47 sections two, three and four of this act respectively, shall be devel- 48 oped no later than one hundred eighty days after the effective date of 49 this act. 50 § 6. This act shall take effect immediately.